tr: Mobilyalar > Bahçe Mobilyaları: Bahçe Yatakları; Bahçe Mobilya Takımları; Bahçe Sedirleri; Bahçe Koltukları; Açık Hava Depolama Kutuları; Bahçe Masaları
hu: Bútor > Kültéri bútorok: Kültéri ágyak; Kültéri bútorkészletek; Kültéri ottománok; Kültéri ülőhelyek; Kültéri tárolódobozok; Kültéri asztalok
el: Έπιπλα > Έπιπλα εξωτερικού χώρου: Κρεβάτια εξωτερικού χώρου; Σετ επίπλων εξωτερικού χώρου; Ντιβάνια εξωτερικού χώρου; Υπαίθρια καθίσματα; Κουτιά αποθήκευσης εξωτερικού χώρου; Τραπέζια εξωτερικού χώρου
pt-BR: Móveis > Móveis para exteriores: Camas de jardim; Cojuntos de móveis para exteriores; Pufes para exteriores; Assentos para exteriores; Baús para armazenamento externo; Mesas para exteriores
zh-TW: 家具 > 戶外家具: 戶外床; 戶外家具組; 戶外凳; 戶外座椅; 戶外置物箱; 戶外桌
zh-CN: 家具 > 户外家具: 户外床具; 户外家具套装; 户外脚凳; 室外座椅; 户外存储箱; 户外用桌
pt-PT: Mobiliário > Mobiliário de exterior: Camas de exterior; Conjuntos de mobiliário de exterior; Otomanas de exterior; Assentos de exterior; Caixas de arrumação de exterior; Mesas de exterior
th: เฟอร์นิเจอร์ > เฟอร์นิเจอร์กลางแจ้ง: ที่นอนกลางแจ้ง; ชุดเฟอร์นิเจอร์กลางแจ้ง; เฟอร์นิเจอร์ออตโตมันกลางแจ้ง; ที่นั่งกลางแจ้ง; กล่องจัดเก็บกลางแจ้ง; โต๊ะสำหรับกลางแจ้ง
lt-LT: Baldai > Lauko baldai: Lauko lovos; Lauko baldų komplektai; Lauko otomanai; Lauko sėdėjimo baldai; Lauko daiktadėžės; Lauko stalai
sv: Möbler > Utomhusmöbler: Utomhussängar; Utomhusmöbelset; Utomhusottomaner; Sittmöbler för utomhusbruk; Förvaringslådor för utomhusbruk; Utomhusbord
sk-SK: Nábytok > Exteriérový nábytok: Exteriérové lehátka; Súpravy exteriérového nábytku; Exteriérové otomany; Vonkajšie sedenie; Exteriérové úložné boxy; Exteriérové stoly
bg-BG: Мебели > Градински мебели: Градински легла; Комплекти градински мебели; Градински табуретки; Места за сядане на открито; Кутии за съхранение на открито; Външни маси
da: Møbler > Havemøbler: Udendørssenge; Havemøbelsæt; Udendørs ottomaner; Udendørs siddepladser; Udendørs opbevaringskasser; Haveborde
it: Arredamento > Arredi per esterno: Letti per esterni; Set di mobili da esterno; Ottomane da esterno; Mobili-sedie da esterno; Contenitori per esterno; Tavoli da esterno
ja: 家具 > 屋外用家具: 屋外用ベッド; 屋外用家具セット; 屋外用オットマン; 屋外用ベンチ・椅子; 屋外用収納ボックス; 屋外用テーブル
vi: Đồ gỗ > Đồ gỗ ngoài trời: Giường ngoài trời; Bộ đồ nội thất ngoài trời; Ghế ottoman ngoài trời; Ghế ngồi ngoài trời; Thùng đựng đồ ngoài trời; Bàn ngoài trời
en: Furniture > Outdoor Furniture: Outdoor Beds; Outdoor Furniture Sets; Outdoor Ottomans; Outdoor Seating; Outdoor Storage Boxes; Outdoor Tables
ru: Мебель > Уличная мебель: Уличные кровати; Наборы садовой мебели; Уличные оттоманки; Уличная мебель для сидения; Уличные ящики для хранения; Уличные столы
nb: Møbler > Utendørsmøbler: Utendørssenger; Utendørs møbelsett; Utendørs-ottomaner; Sittemøbler utendørs; Lagringsbokser for utendørs bruk; Utebord
hr-HR: Namještaj > Vanjski namještaj: Vanjski ležajevi; Kompleti vanjskog namještaja; Vanjski taburei; Vanjski namještaj za sjedenje; Vanjske kutije za odlaganje; Vanjski stolovi
ko: 가구 > 야외용 가구: 야외용 침대; 야외용 가구 세트; 야외용 오토만; 야외용 좌석; 야외용 보관함; 야외용 테이블
sl-SI: Pohištvo > Zunanje pohištvo: Zunanje postelje; Kompleti zunanjega pohištva; Zunanji otomani; Zunanji sedeži; Zunanje škatle za shranjevanje; Zunanje mize
nl: Meubelen > Buitenmeubelen: Buitenbedden; Sets van buitenmeubelen; Buitenpoefs; Buitenzitjes; Opbergboxen voor buiten; Tuintafels
fi: Huonekalut > Ulkokalusteet: Ulkosängyt; Ulkokalustesetit; Ulkorahit; Ulkoistuimet; Säilytyslaatikot ulos; Ulkopöydät
ro-RO: Mobilier > Mobilier de exterior: Paturi de exterior; Seturi de mobilier de exterior; Canapele tip otoman de exterior; Scaune de exterior; Cutii de depozitare de exterior; Mese de exterior
es: Mobiliario > Mobiliario de exterior: Camas para exteriores; Conjuntos de mobiliario de exterior; Otomanas de exterior; Asientos de exterior; Cajas de almacenaje para exteriores; Mesas de exterior
cs: Nábytek > Zahradní nábytek: Venkovní postele; Sady venkovního nábytku; Venkovní otomany; Venkovní sedací nábytek; Venkovní skladovací boxy; Zahradní stoly
de: Möbel > Gartenmöbel: Gartenbetten; Gartenmöbelgarnituren; Gartenhocker; Gartensitzmöbel; Aufbewahrungsbehälter für draußen; Gartentische
fr: Meubles > Meubles de jardin: Lits d’extérieur; Ensembles de meubles d’extérieur; Poufs d’extérieur; Sièges d’extérieur; Coffres de jardin; Tables d’extérieur
pl: Meble > Meble zewnętrzne: Łóżka ogrodowe; Zestawy mebli zewnętrznych; Otomany na zewnątrz; Siedzenia ogrodowe; Pojemniki i skrzynie ogrodowe; Stoły ogrodowe